Texas statutes.
GOVERNMENT CODE

TITLE 5. OPEN GOVERNMENT; ETHICS

SUBTITLE A. OPEN GOVERNMENT

CHAPTER 558. INTERPRETERS FOR DEAF OR HEARING IMPAIRED PERSONS

Sec. 558.001. DEFINITION. In this chapter, "deaf or hearing impaired" means having a hearing impairment, regardless of the existence of a speech impairment, that inhibits:

(1) comprehension of an examination or proceeding; or

(2) communication with others.

Added by Acts 1993, 73rd Leg., ch. 268, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1993.

Sec. 558.002. STATE EXAMINATIONS. (a) A deaf or hearing impaired person taking a state examination required for state employment or issuance of a state license is entitled, on request, to an interpreter.

(b) The interpreter may be paid for not more than eight hours for interpreting in a calendar day and is entitled to $5 for each hour of interpreting in a calendar day, except that the interpreter is entitled to $15 for the first hour.

Added by Acts 1993, 73rd Leg., ch. 268, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1993.

Sec. 558.003. PROCEEDINGS BEFORE POLITICAL SUBDIVISIONS. (a) In a proceeding before the governing body of a political subdivision in which the legal rights, duties, or privileges of a party are to be determined by the governing body after an adjudicative hearing, the governing body shall supply for a party who is deaf or hearing impaired an interpreter who has qualifications approved by the Texas Commission for the Deaf and Hard of Hearing.

(b) In this section, "political subdivision" means a county, municipality, school district, special purpose district, or other subdivision of state government that has jurisdiction limited to a geographic portion of the state.

Added by Acts 1993, 73rd Leg., ch. 268, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1993. Amended by Acts 1995, 74th Leg., ch. 835, Sec. 17, eff. Sept. 1, 1995.